Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.215

Powers relative to systems of sewerage.

The legislative authority of any city or town may exercise all the powers relating to systems of sewerage authorized by RCW 35.67.010 and 35.67.020.

[ 1997 c 447 s 14.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—1997 c 447: See note following RCW 70.05.074.